Missouri, session 2026, HB1644.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 105.510 and 290.500, RSMo, are
repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 105.510, 105.515, 285.075, and 290.500, to
read as follows:
105.510. Employees, except [police,] deputy sheriffs,
Missouri state highway patrolmen, Missouri National Guard,
all teachers of all Missouri schools, colleges and
universities, of any public body shall have the right to
form and join labor organizations and to present proposals
to any public body relative to salaries and other conditions
of employment through the representative of their own
choosing. No such employee shall be discharged or
discriminated against because of his exercise of such right,
nor shall any person or group of persons, directly or
indirectly, by intimidation or coercion, compel or attempt
to compel any such employee to join or refrain from joining
a labor organization, except that the above excepted
employees have the right to form benevolent, social, or
fraternal associations. Membership in such associations may
not be restricted on the basis of race, creed, color,
religion or ancestry.


105.515. 1. For purposes of this section, the term
"first responder" means any firefighter, emergency medical
technician, 911 dispatcher, police dispatcher, and police
officer.
2. Within thirty days after a labor organization has
been designated as the exclusive bargaining representative
for the first responders in a bargaining unit,
representatives of the public body, designated by the public
body, and representatives of the labor organization,
selected by the labor organization, shall meet and begin
bargaining in good faith for an agreement covering the
wages, benefits, and other terms and conditions of
employment for the first responders within the bargaining
unit.
3. The labor organization and the public body shall
engage in good faith bargaining with each other's designated
representatives.
4. (1) In the event that an agreement cannot be
reached within one hundred eighty days after a labor
organization is designated as the exclusive bargaining
representative for the first responders in a bargaining
unit, the dispute shall be referred to mediation pursuant to
this subsection.
(2) Within fourteen days after the period in
subdivision (1) of this subsection has expired, the parties
shall mutually agree on a neutral mediator selected from a
panel of neutrals from the United States District Court of
either the Western or Eastern District of Missouri. If the
parties cannot agree on a neutral mediator within fourteen
days, the matter shall be referred to the board and the
board shall assign a mediator.
(3) If, after the dispute has been referred to a
mediator, whether the neutral mediator or the state board of


mediation, the dispute has not been resolved within ninety
days, the dispute shall be referred to arbitration through
an arbitrator as selected pursuant to subsection 5 of this
section.
(4) Upon mutual agreement of the parties, the
obligation to submit the matter to mediation pursuant to
this subsection may be waived and the matter may be
immediately submitted to interest arbitration in accordance
with subsection 5 of this section.
5. (1) At any time during the bargaining process, if
either the labor organization or the public body determines
an impasse has been reached over wages, benefits, hours, or
other terms and conditions of employment, the party may
submit the matter to interest arbitration.
(2) If the parties agree that an impasse has been
reached, within seven days of such decision, the public body
and labor organization shall attempt to agree upon an
impartial arbitrator to resolve the impasse.
(3) If an arbitrator cannot be agreed upon within such
time period, the party that made the initial determination
of impasse or, if agreement was not reached and mediation
was unsuccessful or waived, the labor organization, shall
request a panel of seven arbitrators from the Federal
Mediation and Conciliation Service (FMCS) or, if the FMCS
cannot produce a panel of seven arbitrators, the American
Arbitration Association (AAA). The parties shall alternate
striking from the panel one arbitrator at a time until a
single arbitrator is left, with the party that requested the
panel striking first. The party striking first shall have
an affirmative duty to notify the board that the matter has
been referred to interest arbitration pursuant to this
subsection.


(4) Once an arbitrator has been selected pursuant to
subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection, the parties shall
proceed to resolve whether the matter will be presented to
the arbitrator as a total package, issue by issue, or a
combination of both. If the parties fail to agree upon a
method of presentation to the arbitrator, a prehearing
conference shall be held at which each party shall present
its position to the arbitrator and the arbitrator shall then
determine the method of presentation. If the parties cannot
mutually agree upon a date to present their respective
arguments, the arbitrator shall set a hearing date at which
the labor organization and public body shall each be
afforded the opportunity to present its respective case,
including a presentation of evidence, data, and testimony,
in support of its proposal. The arbitrator shall consider
the evidence and render a decision within forty-five days.
If the parties do not agree an impasse has been reached, in
a singular hearing, the arbitrator shall hear both the
procedural and substantive arguments of the parties. Before
the arbitrator can render a decision on the parties'
substantive arguments, the arbitrator shall first determine
whether an impasse has been reached. The decision of the
arbitrator shall be binding upon the parties, provided that
any provision that would require the enactment of law for
its implementation shall not be binding until such time as
the law is enacted.
(5) All proceedings before the board and the
arbitrator shall be recorded with a written transcript being
available to each party. The costs of the arbitrator and
court reporter shall be borne by both parties equally. Any
attorney's fees accrued by any party shall be the
responsibility of the party accruing the same.


6. For all successor collective bargaining agreements,
if at any time during the bargaining process either the
100 labor organization or the public body determines an impasse
101 has been reached over wages, benefits, hours, or other terms
102 and conditions of employment or a successor agreement is not
103 achieved within one hundred eighty days after the expiration
104 of the predecessor collective bargaining agreement, either
105 party may submit the matter to interest arbitration in
106 accordance with subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of this
107 section. Upon submission to interest arbitration, the
108 arbitrator shall be selected and the matter shall be handled
109 pursuant to subdivisions (2), (3), and (4) of subsection 5
110 of this section.
111 7. For purposes of this section, the term "good faith"
112 includes, but is not limited to, approaching negotiations
113 with a sincere intention to reach an agreement, meeting at
114 reasonable times, dealing with the respective parties in an
115 honest and open manner, and matching unacceptable proposals
116 with sincere counter-proposals with the sincere intent to
117 reach an agreement. Acting in good faith includes more than
118 a perfunctory performance of an obligation to meet and
119 confer with the requisite parties.
120 8. If, at any time during the bargaining process for
121 an initial contract as set forth in subsections 2 and 4 of
122 this section or for successor contracts as set forth in
123 subsection 6 of this section, either the labor organization
124 or public body believes the opposing party has engaged in
125 bad faith bargaining in violation of subsection 3 of this
126 section, it may submit the matter to the board for
127 determination. If the board determines a party has engaged
128 in bad faith bargaining in violation of subsection 3 of this
129 section, it shall refer the matter to interest arbitration


130 in accordance with the provisions of subdivisions (3) to (5)
131 of subsection 5 of this section.
132 9. At no time after a labor organization has been
133 designated as the exclusive bargaining representative for
134 the first responders in a bargaining unit, or after an
135 agreement covering the wages, benefits, and other terms and
136 conditions of employment for first responders within a
137 bargaining unit has expired, shall the public body make any
138 unilateral changes to wages, benefits, or other terms and
139 conditions of employment subject to mandatory bargaining.
140 Any such unilateral changes shall be considered a failure to
141 bargain in good faith. If the labor organization believes
142 that the public body has made unilateral changes to wages,
143 benefits, or other terms and conditions of employment
144 subject to mandatory bargaining, the labor organization may
145 seek declaratory relief, injunctive relief, and monetary
146 damages arising from the unlawful unilateral change in an
147 appropriate state or federal court.
285.075. 1. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement
entered into between the United States Department of Labor
and a franchisee or a franchisor, neither a franchisee nor a
franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of
the franchisor for any purpose, unless the franchisor
exercises direct and immediate control over the hiring,
termination, discipline, and direction of the franchisee's
employees.
2. For purposes of this section, the terms
"franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same meaning as in 16
CFR 436.1.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, this section shall not be construed to affect
employee or employer status under Article I, Section 29, of
the Missouri Constitution or the National Labor Relations


Act, 29 U.S.C. Section 151, et. seq., or its successor
provisions.
290.500. As used in sections 290.500 to 290.530, the
following words and phrases mean:
(1) "Agriculture", farming and all its branches
including, but not limited to, the cultivation and tillage
of the soil, dairying, the production, cultivation, growing
and harvesting of any agricultural commodities, the raising
of livestock, fish and other marine life, bees, fur-bearing
animals or poultry and any practices performed by a farmer
or on a farm as an incident to or in conjunction with
farming operations, including preparation for market,
delivery to storage or to market or to carriers for
transportation to market;
(2) "Director", the director of the department of
labor and industrial relations or his authorized
representative;
(3) "Employee", any individual employed by an
employer, except that the term "employee" shall not include:
(a) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity;
(b) Any individual engaged in the activities of an
educational, charitable, religious, or nonprofit
organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not, in fact, exist or where the services rendered to the
organization are on a voluntary basis;
(c) Any individual standing in loco parentis to foster
children in their care;
(d) Any individual employed for less than four months
in any year in a resident or day camp for children or youth,
or any individual employed by an educational conference
center operated by an educational, charitable or not-for-
profit organization;


(e) Any individual engaged in the activities of an
educational organization where employment by the
organization is in lieu of the requirement that the
individual pay the cost of tuition, housing or other
educational fees of the organization or where earnings of
the individual employed by the organization are credited
toward the payment of the cost of tuition, housing or other
educational fees of the organization;
(f) Any individual employed on or about a private
residence on an occasional basis for six hours or less on
each occasion;
(g) Any handicapped person employed in a sheltered
workshop, certified by the department of elementary and
secondary education;
(h) Any person employed on a casual basis to provide
baby-sitting services;
(i) Any individual employed by an employer subject to
the provisions of part A of subtitle IV of title 49, United
States Code, 49 U.S.C. §§ 10101 et seq.;
(j) Any individual employed on a casual or
intermittent basis as a golf caddy, newsboy, or in a similar
occupation;
(k) Any individual whose earnings are derived in whole
or in part from sales commissions and whose hours and places
of employment are not substantially controlled by the
employer;
(l) Any individual who is employed in any government
position defined in 29 U.S.C. §§ 203(e)(2)(C)(i)-(ii);
(m) Any individual employed by a retail or service
business whose annual gross volume sales made or business
done is less than five hundred thousand dollars;
(n) Any individual who is an offender, as defined in
section 217.010, who is incarcerated in any correctional


facility operated by the department of corrections,
including offenders who provide labor or services on the
grounds of such correctional facility pursuant to section
217.550;
(o) Any individual described by the provisions of
section 29 U.S.C. 213(a) (8);
(p) Any individual who has entered into a contract to
play baseball at the minor league level and who is
compensated pursuant to the terms of a collective bargaining
agreement that expressly provides for wages and working
conditions;
(4) "Employer", any person acting directly or
indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an
employee;
(5) "Learner and apprentice", any individual under 20
years of age who has not completed the required training for
a particular job. In no event shall the individual be
deemed a learner or apprentice in the occupation after three
months of training except where the director finds, after
investigation, that for the particular occupation a minimum
of proficiency cannot be acquired in three months. In no
case shall a person be declared to be a learner or
apprentice after six months of training for a particular
employer or job. Employees of an amusement or recreation
business that meets the criteria set out in 29 U.S.C. §
213(a) (3) may be deemed a learner or apprentice for ninety
working days. No individual shall be deemed a learner or
apprentice solely for the purpose of evading the provisions
of sections 290.500 to 290.530;
(6) "Occupation", any occupation, service, trade,
business, industry, or branch or group of industries or
employment or class of employment in which individuals are
gainfully employed;


(7) "Wage", compensation due to an employee by reason
of his employment, payable in legal tender of the United
100 States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand at
101 full face value;
102 (8) "Person", any individual, partnership,
103 association, corporation, business, business trust, legal
104 representative, or any organized group of persons;
105 (9) "Man-day", any day during which an employee
106 performs any agricultural labor for not less than one hour.